Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-129
Stockholders' meeting; Director of Banking and Finance may call; notice; expense.

Whenever the director shall deem it expedient he may call a meeting of the stockholders of any bank organized under the laws of this state, by mailing notice of such meeting to each stockholder five days previous thereto. All necessary expenses incurred in the giving of such notice shall be borne by the bank whose stockholders are required to convene.

Laws 1933, c. 18, § 41, p. 157;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-1,126;

R.S.1943, § 8-1,106;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 29, p. 146.